Utah statutes.
53A-11-901.   Public school discipline policies -- Basis of the policies -- Enforcement.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes that every student in the public schools should have the opportunity to learn in an environment which is safe, conducive to the learning process, and free from unnecessary disruption.

(2) (a)  To foster such an environment, each local school board or governing board of a charter school, with input from school employees, parents and guardians of students, students, and the community at large, shall adopt conduct and discipline policies for the public schools.

(b)  Each district or charter school shall base its policies on the principle that every student is expected:

(i)  to follow accepted rules of conduct; and

(ii)  to show respect for other people and to obey persons in authority at the school.

(c) (i)  The State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop conduct and discipline policy models for elementary and secondary public schools.

(ii)  Each district or charter school shall use the models, where appropriate, in developing its conduct and discipline policies under this chapter.

(d)  The policies shall emphasize that certain behavior, most particularly behavior which disrupts, is unacceptable and may result in disciplinary action.

(3)  The local superintendent and designated employees of the district or charter school shall enforce the policies so that students demonstrating unacceptable behavior and their parents or guardians understand that such behavior will not be tolerated and will be dealt with in accordance with the district's conduct and discipline policies.



Amended by Chapter 161, 2007 General Session

